Utah statutes.
72-4-128.   State highways -- SR-222, SR-224 to SR-228.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-222. From Route 113 in Midway northerly to Pine Creek Campground.

(2)  SR-224.  From the Wasatch-Summit County line through Ontario Canyon and Park City to Route 80 at Kimball Junction.

(3)  SR-225.  From Clarke Lane via Park Lane to Route 106 in Farmington.

(4)  SR-226.  From Snow Basin Ski Lodge lower parking lot in Weber County southeasterly to Route 167 the Trappers Loop Road.

(5)  SR-227.  From Route 15 near Glover Lane north on Walker Lane to State Street; then east to Route 106 in Farmington.

(6)  SR-228.  From the northbound off-ramp of Route 15 at the South Leeds Interchange; then northerly on Main Street in Leeds to the northbound on-ramp of Route 15; then westerly to the southbound off-ramp of Route 15; and from the southbound on-ramp of Route 15 easterly to Main Street in Leeds.

